Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1294
Salvage or previously salvaged title brand; procedure; fee.

Whenever a title is issued in this state for a motorboat that is designated as salvage or previously salvaged, the following title brands shall be required: Salvage or previously salvaged. A certificate branded salvage or previously salvaged shall be administered in the same manner and for the same fee as provided for a certificate of title in sections 37-1275 to 37-1287.

Laws 2004, LB 560, § 7.